Nebraska, session 109, LB558.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. (1) The Infrastructure Review Task Force is created.
(2) The task force shall:
(a) Review and analyze Nebraska's transportation infrastructure network;
(b) Examine and consider Nebraska's historic transportation infrastructure
development efforts and expected future transportation infrastructure needs;
(c) Utilize information and research available from the annual report on
the needs of the state highway system prepared by the Department of
Transportation and any other information or resources available to the
department;
(d) Examine the status and condition of Nebraska's transportation
infrastructure with consideration given to highway safety concerns and make
recommendations as to how Nebraska might maintain and ensure safe
transportation infrastructure now and in the future;
(e) Consider transportation through the lens of its economic impact on
Nebraska; and
(f) Research any federal funding that may be available to Nebraska and
make recommendations as to how Nebraska might obtain and use such funds.
(3)(a) The task force consists of the following members:
(i) The Governor;
(ii) A designee of the Governor;
(iii) The chairperson of the Revenue Committee of the Legislature;
(iv) The chairperson of the Transportation and Telecommunications
Committee of the Legislature;
(v) The Speaker of the Legislature;
(vi) The Director-State Engineer;
(vii) The Tax Commissioner; and
(viii) Three members of the Legislature appointed by the Executive Board
of the Legislative Council.
(b) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislature shall
be nonvoting, ex officio members.
(4) The chairperson of the task force shall be the chairperson of the
Revenue Committee of the Legislature. Any staff support needed for the task
force shall be fulfilled by the staff of the Revenue Committee of the
Legislature.
(5) The members of the task force shall serve on the task force without
compensation.
(6) On or before December 1 of each year, the task force shall submit a
report containing the results of its work study and its recommendations, if
any, together with drafts of legislation necessary to carry out its
recommendations. The reports shall be submitted electronically to the Clerk of
the Legislature.
-1-